Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB471.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "doula" means a trained professional who provides
physical, emotional, and educational support, but not medical care, to women
before, during, and after childbirth.
(2) The Department for Medicaid Services and any managed care organization with
whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services shall provide
coverage for doula services if the doula has:
(a) Applied for and received a national Provider Identification Number from
the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services; and
(b) Completed enrollment as a Medicaid provider, as may be required by the
Department for Medicaid Services.
(3) The Department for Medicaid Services shall:
(a) Prior to enrolling doulas as Medicaid providers and in collaboration with
the Doula Advisory Council established in Section 2 of this Act, establish
training and credentialing requirements for doulas; and
(b) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 194A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Doula Advisory Council is hereby established within the Department for
Public Health.
(2) The council shall consist of the following twenty (20) members:
(a) The commissioner of the Department for Public Health or his or her
designee who shall serve as chair of the council;
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 11/19/2025 1:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 72
(b) The commissioner of the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental
and Intellectual Disabilities or his or her designee;
(c) The director of the Division of Maternal and Child Health or his or her
designee;
(d) The executive director of the Kentucky Association of Health Plans or his
or her designee;
(e) Eight (8) individuals appointed by the commissioner of the Department for
Public Health of which at least one (1) shall be:
1. A mother who has used doula services for at least two (2) child births;
2. A certified nurse midwife;
3. A certified professional midwife;
4. A representative of the Kentucky Hospital Association selected from a
list of three (3) names provided by the Kentucky Hospital Association;
5. An obstetrician with demonstrated work-related experience in
community, health equity, and training in equitable healthcare
practices;
6. A representative of a community-based maternal and child health
organization; and
7. A representative of a local health department working in maternal and
child health; and
(f) Eight (8) individuals who are actively practicing as doulas in the
Commonwealth appointed by the commissioner of the Department for
Public Health of which:
1. One (1) shall reside in and represent each of the eight (8) federal
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services regions in Kentucky; and
2. At least one (1) shall be a doula with lactation training.
(3) Members of the council who are not state employees shall be reimbursed for
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 11/19/2025 1:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 72
necessary and actual expenses, including child care.
(4) The council shall meet at least quarterly and at other times as it determines may
be necessary to perform its duties. A majority of the members shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of the council's business.
(5) The duties of the council shall include:
(a) Making recommendations to the Department for Medicaid Services for:
1. Training, credentialing, and continuing education standards to be
required for a doula to be eligible for Medicaid enrollment;
2. Standards for recognizing doula training curricula and practical
experience that may be sufficient to satisfy training, credentialing, and
continuing education requirements; and
3. Establishing scope of practice for doulas, including prenatal and
postnatal services and labor and delivery support;
(b) Conducting a continuous review of doula training programs; and
(c) Advising the Department for Public Health on:
1. Increasing access to education and resources for pregnant women and
their families;
2. Improving access to doula services; and
3. Furthering interagency efforts to address maternal health disparities.
(6) In making recommendations to the Department for Medicaid Services for
training and credentialing requirements as required under subsection (5)(a) of
this section, the council shall consider both formal training programs and
previous experience an individual may have as a doula or in providing doula
services.
Section 3. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 1 or 2 of this Act
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 11/19/2025 1:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 72
is necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with federal law, the cabinet
or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this section, request the
necessary federal authorization or approval to implement Sections 1 and 2 of this Act;
and
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this
Act for which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the federal
authorization or approval is granted.
Section 4. Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this Act shall constitute the specific
authorization required under KRS 205.5372(1).
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 11/19/2025 1:57 PM Jacketed